Utah statutes.
73-28-402.   Agreement for delivery -- Period for repayment of costs.
(1)  The board and each district shall establish by contract the timing and
amount of developed water to be delivered to the district.
(2)  If a contract was made before the project's completion, the district
shall repay the preconstruction and construction costs within 50 years from
the date of:
(a)  the delivery of developed water to the district during the first 10 years
after the project is completed; or
(b)  the project's completion for any developed water delivered to the
district after the tenth anniversary date of the project's completion.
(3)  If a contract was made after the project's completion date, the district
shall repay the preconstruction and construction costs within a period not to
exceed 50 years from the date that the contract was made.
(4)  The board shall establish and charge a reasonable interest rate for the
unpaid balance of reimbursable preconstruction and construction costs.
